Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 196.540 is amended to read:
196.540. The State Department of Fish and Wildlife, State  Fish and Wildlife Commission, State
Land Board and relevant state agencies shall, consistent with  existing statutory authority, imple-
ment:
(1) The November 29, 2008, recommendations  from the Ocean Policy Advisory Council on marine
reserves by adopting rules to establish, study, monitor, evaluate and enforce a pilot marine  reserve
at Otter Rock and a pilot marine reserve and a marine protected area at Redfish Rocks.
(2) The January 25, 2011, recommendations, limited to those related to  boundaries and allow-
ances, from the State Department of Fish and Wildlife on marine reserves by adopting rules to es-
tablish, study, monitor, evaluate and enforce:
(a) A marine reserve and two marine protected areas at Cape Falcon;
(b) A marine reserve and three marine protected areas at Cascade Head; and
Enrolled House Bill 4132 (HB 4132-B) Page 1
(c) A marine reserve, two marine protected areas and  a seabird protection area at Cape
Perpetua.
(3) The  October 25, 2022, recommendations from the Ocean Policy Advisory Council to
develop for the marine reserves:
(a) An adaptive management plan that includes the development and implementation of:
(A) Specific, measurable, achievable,  relevant and time-oriented objectives for ecological
and socioeconomic monitoring and research;
(B) Consistent measurable indicators of social impacts;
(C) Efficient long-term  ecological sampling protocols that remain consistent and respon-
sive to adaptive management;
(D) Assessment  of the capacity for the marine reserves to enhance ecological resilience
to environmental disturbances, including data collection and evaluation  over long periods of
time and on how the reserves operate as a network; and
(E) Defined goals for outreach and  engagement, including engagement with federally re-
cognized Indian tribes, and  assessments to evaluate the effectiveness in achieving these
goals.
(b) A collaborative process through which social monitoring data on the reserves  can be
interpreted to affect policy decisions. The process should include steps for decision-making
and conflict management.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 196.545 is amended to read:
196.545. (1) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife, in consultation with members  from the
scientific and technical advisory committee established under ORS 196.451,  other relevant marine
and fishery scientists, relevant  state agencies, ocean users and coastal communities shall implement
the activities described in ORS 196.540 by developing and amending a work plan  and adaptive
management plan consistent with ORS 196.540 .
(2) The work plan shall contain the following elements regarding the  marine reserves described
in ORS 196.540:
(a) A biological assessment, including  information on habitat characterization, biological re-
sources, local knowledge and, for the established [ pilot] marine reserves, monitoring plans.
(b) A socioeconomic assessment, including a description of  human uses, net effects on sport and
commercial fisheries and communities and, for the established  [ pilot] marine reserves, monitoring
plans.
(c) Formation of community teams,  with diverse and balanced stakeholder representation that
includes local government, recreational fishing industry, commercial fishing  industry, nonfishing in-
dustry, recreationalists, conservation, coastal watershed councils, relevant marine and avian  scien-
tists, to collaborate and develop recommendations  as  needed for potential  changes to  marine
reserves, considering the biological and socioeconomic information developed under  this
section.  Collaboration  may be facilitated by a neutral outside party hired through a competitive
bidding process.
(d) Provision of information on the process and data  gathered to interested parties and made
available to the public.
(e) Development of scientifically based goals specific to each of the marine reserve  sites, incor-
porating continuity and cumulative outcomes, benefits and impacts.
[(f) Provision of baseline data on Oregon’s territorial sea, as defined in ORS 196.405. ]
[(g)] (f)  Development of an enforcement plan in consultation with the Oregon State Police and
representatives from affected user groups.
[(h)] (g)  Use of communities and volunteers to assist in implementing  the work plan where fea-
sible and practical.
(h) Continued engagement of communities, including commercial and  recreational fishing
fleets, in order to ensure that marine reserve science is useful to communities and that  the
department incorporates community and fishermen knowledge into  ongoing research and
monitoring efforts.
Enrolled House Bill 4132 (HB 4132-B) Page 2
[(3) The data and recommendations produced from the work  plan and other available nearshore
data shall be used by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, in consultation with the  Ocean Policy
Advisory Council, to recommend the number, size, location and restriction limits of  the potential sites
for marine reserve  designation, consistent with Executive Order 08-07. If, through this process, it is
determined that other appropriate sites need to be considered or that  potential sites are not consistent
with Executive Order 08-07, then the data and recommendations produced shall be provided to the
public, the State Department of  Fish and Wildlife and other relevant state agencies for future purposes
relevant to nearshore management. ]
SECTION 3.
 ORS 196.542 is amended to read:
196.542. [(1) The State Fish and Wildlife Commission may not  impose prohibitions on fishing by
rule pursuant to ORS 196.540  until the baseline data specified in ORS 196.545 (2)(f) have been collected
consistent with scientifically based monitoring plans. ]
[(2)] In implementing the activities  described in ORS 196.540 pursuant to ORS 196.545, the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife shall use local resources where feasible and practical.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (1), chapter 590, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Fish Division, is  increased by $894,324 for
an adaptive management and social monitoring program to support marine reserves.
SECTION 5. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4132 (HB 4132-B) Page 3